District of Columbia statutes.
8-151.14

Compilation of laws, regulations, and rules.

(a)

Within one year after February 15, 2006, the Mayor shall have compiled, indexed, and published in the District of Columbia Register all laws and regulations of the District of Columbia relating to the environment and rules adopted by the Mayor or by an agency in effect at the time of the compilation. The compilation shall be supplemented or revised periodically as necessary.

(b)

The compilation, including any supplements or revisions, shall be made available to the public at a price fixed by the Mayor.

Feb. 15, 2006, D.C. Law 16-51, § 114, 52 DCR 10812